New Jersey, session 221, S1247.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.   The Commissioner of Transportation shall, in consultation with the Division of Parks and Forestry in the Department of Environmental Protection, the Historic Sites Council in the Department of Environmental Protection, the New Jersey Historic Trust in the Department of Community Affairs, and the Division of Travel and Tourism in the Department of State, develop a common design for roadway signs that indicate a historic district or historic site, which shall include, but not be limited to, an identifiable historic symbol to indicate a historic time period, event, or war that relates to the historic site or historic district. b.    The signs shall be designed, fabricated, located, and installed in accordance with the standards and guidance of the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices for Streets and Highways issued by the Federal Highway Administration. c.     Following the effective date of this act, P.L.   , c.   (C.   ) (pending before the legislature as this bill), whenever a State entity replaces an existing roadway sign that indicates a historic district or historic site, the new sign shall conform to the common design, fabrication, and location elements required by this section. d.    As used in this section: "Historic district" means one or more historic sites and intervening or surrounding property significantly affecting or affected by the quality and character of the historic site or sites. "Historic site" means any real property, man-made structure, natural object or configuration or any portion or group of the foregoing of historical, archeological, cultural, scenic, or architectural significance. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.